Maine, session 132, LD873.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §2517, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1999, c. 753, §13, is further
amended to read:
1. Revocation of pole location by municipal officers. When the municipal officers
of a municipality having a population of more than 40,000 30,000 inhabitants determine,
after notice and hearing, that public safety and the public welfare require the revocation of
a location for poles for conveying electricity or for the transmission of telephone messages
already erected in a public street or way other than a state or a state-aid highway outside
the compact area of an urban compact municipality as defined in Title 23, section 754, they
may revoke the location and order the poles removed. The person that owns the poles shall
remove them within a reasonable time. Other suitable locations or the right to use other
poles jointly must be granted by the municipal officers to the person.
Page 1 - 132LR1455(02)